Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Surplus Agricultural Commodities for Food Banks

247.980.
Definitions for KRS 247.980 to 247.986.

As used in KRS

247.980

to

247.986

:

“Agricultural commodity” means any agricultural product, including but not limited to plant and animal products grown, raised, or produced within this state for use as food, feed, seed, or any aesthetic, industrial, or chemurgic purpose; and

“Food bank” means a surplus food collection and distribution system operated and established to assist in bringing donated food to nonprofit charitable organizations and individuals for redistribution to reduce hunger and supply nutritional needs.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 24, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

247.981.
Grant program for supplying surplus agricultural commodities to food banks.

There is hereby established in the Department of Agriculture a program to award grants to nonprofit organizations for the purpose of collecting and distributing Kentucky grown and raised surplus agricultural commodities to food banks and other charitable organizations that serve needy or low-income individuals.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 24, § 2, effective June 25, 2009.

247.982.
Grant program eligibility and compliance.

Subject to available funds, a nonprofit organization is eligible to receive a grant under KRS

247.980

to

247.986

if the organization:

Has at least five (5) years of experience coordinating a statewide network of food banks and charitable organizations that serve counties of this state;

Operates a program that coordinates the collection and transportation of surplus agricultural commodities to a statewide network of food banks that provide food to needy or low-income individuals; and

Submits to the department, in a manner and time prescribed by the department, a proposal for the collection and distribution of agricultural commodities to food banks and other charitable organizations for use in providing food for needy or low-income individuals, including:

A description of the proposal;

A schedule of projected costs for the proposal;

Measurable goals for the proposal; and

A plan for evaluating the success of the proposal.

A nonprofit organization that receives a grant under KRS

247.980

to

247.986

shall comply with the following requirements:

Purchases shall be made from Kentucky farmers, growers, and vendors;

Agricultural commodities collected and distributed shall be culls or those designated as surplus or unmarketable, and not primary agricultural commodities. Surplus or unmarketable agricultural commodities or culls shall be purchased at production cost or below market price from produce auctions, farmers, growers, and vendors; and

Donations of culls or surplus or unmarketable agricultural commodities from farmers’ markets, cooperatives, farmers, and growers shall be encouraged. Persons making the donations may be reimbursed for picking, packaging, processing, transportation, storage, distribution, or other costs.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 24, § 3, effective June 25, 2009.

247.983.
Reporting of results.

A nonprofit organization that receives a grant under KRS

247.980

to

247.986

shall report the results of the project to the department in a manner prescribed by the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 24, § 4, effective June 25, 2009.

247.984.
Farms to Food Banks Advisory Committee.

The Farms to Food Banks Advisory Committee is hereby created for the purpose of advising the department concerning the implementation and administration of the program established under KRS

247.980

to

247.986

. The committee shall be composed of no fewer than ten (10) but no more than fifteen (15) members appointed by the Commissioner. Membership on the committee shall include:

Food and nutrition advocates;

Regional food bank representatives;

Local government representatives;

Representatives of the department and Governor’s Office;

Agricultural commodity producers;

Representatives of farm advocacy groups;

Representatives of Kentucky public or private colleges and universities; and

At-large members designated by the Commissioner.

The advisory committee shall elect a chairperson during the first organizational meeting.

The committee shall:

Advise the department concerning the implementation and administration of KRS

247.980

to

247.986

;

Make recommendations to the department regarding the content of administrative regulations promulgated by the department in accordance with KRS

247.980

to

247.986

;

Advise the department on administration of the fund created pursuant to KRS

247.985

by developing a written plan for the expenditure of funds. The committee shall meet at least one (1) time a year to review the plan and prepare the annual report. The plan shall, at a minimum, include the following:

A summary of existing food banks in Kentucky;

An evaluation of the needs of the hungry in Kentucky, including the population of areas served by food banks, the percent of the population that is at or below the federal poverty level, an estimate of the number of school children who receive free or reduced-price meals, and other criteria that can measure need; and

A proposal for distributing funds to areas of recognized need; and

Provide to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission an annual report by October 1 of each year. The initial report shall include the plan developed under paragraph (c) of this subsection for the expenditure of funds. The initial and future reports shall include details of the amounts and recipients of funds distributed.

Appointed committee members may be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred while engaged in carrying out the official duties of the committee.

The committee shall be attached to the Department of Agriculture for administrative purposes.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 24, § 5, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 159, § 3, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 6, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2012). In 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 159, sec. 3, subsection (3)(c)2., “free or reduced meals” has been changed to read, “free or reduced-price meals” in codification. The Reviser of Statutes has corrected this manifest clerical or typographical error under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(h).

247.985.
Farms to food banks trust fund.

The farms to food banks trust fund is hereby created in the State Treasury as a restricted account to be administered by the department with advice from the Farms to Food Banks Advisory Committee established by KRS

247.984

, for the purposes provided in this section.

The fund shall receive amounts collected from the income tax checkoff created in KRS

141.448

, and any other proceeds from grants, contributions, appropriations, or other moneys made available for the purposes of this fund.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any moneys accruing to this fund in any fiscal year, including state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, interest, and any other funds both public and private, shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Moneys received in the fund shall only be used for awarding grants to eligible nonprofit organizations pursuant to KRS

247.980

to

247.986

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 24, § 6, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 159, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 6, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

247.986.
Administrative Regulations.

The Commissioner shall promulgate the administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS

247.980

to

247.986

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 24, § 7, effective June 25, 2009.